District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.02

Establishment of Program.

(a)

There is hereby established the District of Columbia Health Professional Recruitment Program (“Program”) to serve as a recruitment tool for health professionals within the District of Columbia.

(b)

Based on the availability of funds, the Program will pay for the cost of education necessary to obtain a health professional degree. The Program will pay toward the outstanding principal, interest, and related expense of federal, state, or local government loans and commercial loans obtained by the participant for:

(1)

School tuition and required fees incurred by the participant; and

(2)

Reasonable educational expenses.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 3, 53 DCR 61